Hawaii statutes.
§349-10 Annual senior citizen's fair.
Each county may hold an annual senior citizen's fair in its respective county.
The county shall be responsible for the planning, organizing, and coordinating
of the fair in every respect. The state policy advisory board for elder
affairs may assist the county in any aspect upon request. Proceeds earned from
this fair are deemed to be proceeds earned from casual sales as defined in
chapter 237. The county shall distribute such proceeds to the various senior
citizen organizations and individuals who participate in the fair in accordance
with appropriate methods of distribution as determined by the county. [L 1976,
c 217, pt of §2; am L 1979, c 136, §1(3); am L 1990, c 67, §8]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next